Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-4,127
Indebtedness.

Whenever two or more school districts are involved in a reorganization plan pursuant to the Learning Community Reorganization Act, the old districts shall continue to be responsible for any indebtedness incurred before the reorganization takes place unless a different arrangement is included in the plan.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 38.